Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5759YH (5) 91 sb/js H.F. 2261 Section 1. Section 476.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 22. Large energy use facilities. 3 a. For purposes of this subsection: 4 (1) âCosts of servingâ includes, as applicable, the costs 5 incurred by an electric utility or water utility in providing 6 electric transmission, distribution, energy, water service, 7 capacity, or ancillary electricity or water services, and any 8 related costs or associated risks with serving a customer class 9 or customer. 10 (2) âLarge energy use facilityâ means a facility that uses 11 or is able to use twenty megawatts or more and is primarily 12 engaged in providing a service as described under code number 13 518210 of the North American industry classification system. 14 (3) âWater utilityâ means a public utility that furnishes 15 water by piped distribution system to the public for 16 compensation. 17 b. (1) The commission shall create a customer class 18 for each customer that is a large energy use facility. The 19 customer class must be separate and distinct from customer 20 classes for other customers and have its own rates, charges, 21 and schedules. Any rate, charge, or schedule approved by 22 the commission for the class must meet all of the following 23 requirements: 24 (a) Directly assign the costs of serving to the customer. 25 (b) Mitigate the risk of other customer classes paying 26 unwarranted costs. 27 (c) Mitigate the risk of shifting, in an unwarranted manner, 28 the costs of serving a customer that is a large energy use 29 facility to other customer classes, including costs incurred by 30 an electric utility or water utility to meet load requirements 31 resulting from the provision of electricity service or water 32 service to a customer that is a large energy use facility. 33 (2) In deciding whether to approve a proposed rate, charge, 34 or schedule of an electric utility or water utility for a 35 -1- LSB 5759YH (5) 91 sb/js 1/ 6 H.F. 2261 customer class described under this subsection, the commission 1 shall consider whether the rate, charge, or schedule may do any 2 of the following: 3 (a) Result in, or have the potential to result in, increased 4 costs or unwarranted risk to other customers. 5 (b) Provide for equitable contributions to grid efficiency, 6 distribution efficiency, reliability, and resiliency benefits. 7 (c) Meet any other conditions the commission may require in 8 the public interest. 9 (3) An electric utility or water utility and a customer 10 that is a large energy use facility are not required to 11 use a classification of service provided for under this 12 subsection if the commission has not approved for the electric 13 utility or water utility a rate, charge, or schedule for that 14 classification of service. 15 c. (1) Notwithstanding section 476.1, subsection 3, this 16 paragraph shall apply to all municipally owned waterworks, 17 waterworks having less than two thousand customers, joint water 18 utilities established pursuant to chapter 389, rural water 19 districts incorporated and organized pursuant to chapters 357A 20 and 504, and cooperative water associations incorporated and 21 organized pursuant to chapter 499 that provide service to a 22 large energy use facility. This paragraph shall not apply to 23 water utilities subject to paragraph âbâ . 24 (2) Any water utility providing service to a large energy 25 use facility shall create a customer class for each customer 26 that is a large energy use facility. The customer class must 27 be separate and distinct from customer classes for other 28 customers and have its own rates, charges, and schedules. 29 Any rate, charge, or schedule must meet all the following 30 requirements: 31 (a) Directly assign the costs of serving to the customer. 32 (b) Mitigate the risk of other customer classes paying 33 unwarranted costs. 34 (c) Mitigate the risk of shifting, in an unwarranted manner, 35 -2- LSB 5759YH (5) 91 sb/js 2/ 6 H.F. 2261 the costs of serving a customer that is a large energy use 1 facility to other customer classes, including costs incurred by 2 a water utility to meet load requirements resulting from the 3 provision of water service to a customer that is a large energy 4 use facility. 5 (3) In calculating a rate, charge, or schedule of a water 6 utility for a customer class described under this subsection, 7 the water utility shall consider whether the rate, charge, or 8 schedule may do any of the following: 9 (a) Result in, or have the potential to result in, increased 10 costs or unwarranted risk to other customers. 11 (b) Provide for equitable contributions to distribution 12 efficiency, reliability, and resiliency benefits. 13 (c) Meet any other conditions the commission may require in 14 the public interest. 15 (4) (a) Upon request by the commission, a water utility 16 that provides service to a large energy use facility shall 17 submit documentation to the commission within thirty days of 18 the request that demonstrates compliance with this section. 19 (b) If a water utility does not submit documentation as 20 required by subparagraph (1), the water utility shall be 21 subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commission. 22 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to electric utility 23 services and water utility services provided to large energy 24 use facilities constructed or expanded on or after January 1, 25 2027. 26